etc/dictionaries/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
AM po:nom is:fem is:pl st:charte-partie
AM po:nom is:fem is:pl st:bourse-à-pasteur
AM po:nom is:fem is:pl st:basse-tige
AM po:nom is:fem is:pl st:basse-contre
AM po:nom is:fem is:pl st:analyste-programmeuse
AM po:nom is:epi is:pl st:garde-frontière
AM po:nom is:adj is:epi
AM po:mg po:prorel
AM po:mg po:propersuj po:properobj po:2pe is:epi is:sg
AM po:mg po:propersuj po:properobj po:2pe is:epi is:pl
AM po:mg po:propersuj po:properobj po:1pe is:epi is:sg
AM po:mg po:propersuj po:properobj po:1pe is:epi is:pl
AM po:mg po:propersuj po:3pe is:mas is:pl
AM po:mg po:propersuj po:3pe is:epi is:sg
AM po:mg po:propersuj po:2pe is:epi is:sg
AM po:mg po:propersuj po:2pe is:epi is:pl
AM po:mg po:propersuj po:1pe is:epi is:sg
AM po:mg po:propersuj po:1pe is:epi is:pl
AM po:mg po:properobj po:proadv
AM po:mg po:properobj po:3pe is:epi is:sg is:pl
AM po:mg po:properobj po:3pe is:epi is:pl
AM po:mg po:properobj po:2pe is:epi is:pl
AM po:mg po:properobj po:1pe is:epi is:pl
AM po:mg po:properobj is:mas is:sg
AM po:mg po:properobj is:fem is:sg
AM po:mg po:properobj is:epi is:pl
AM po:mg po:proneg is:fem is:sg
AM po:mg po:proint po:prorel is:fem is:sg
AM po:mg po:proint
AM po:mg po:proind po:prorel
AM po:mg po:proind is:fem is:pl
AM po:mg po:proind is:epi is:pl
AM po:mg po:prodem is:fem
AM po:mg po:prep po:proadv
AM po:mg po:prep po:prepv po:loc.prep
AM po:mg po:prep po:prepv po:loc.cj po:adv
AM po:mg po:prep po:det is:fem is:pl
AM po:mg po:loc.prep po:loc.cj
AM po:mg po:loc.cjsub
AM po:mg po:loc.cj po:prep po:adv
AM po:mg po:loc.cj po:adv
AM po:mg po:loc.cj
AM po:mg po:loc.adv po:loc.prep
AM po:mg po:detind po:proind
AM po:mg po:detind po:detex
AM po:mg po:detind is:mas is:sg
AM po:mg po:detind is:fem is:sg
AM po:mg po:detind is:epi is:sg
AM po:mg po:detind is:epi is:pl
AM po:mg po:detind is:epi
AM po:mg po:detind
AM po:mg po:detdem po:prodem is:mas is:pl
AM po:mg po:detdem po:prodem is:fem is:sg
AM po:mg po:detdem po:prodem is:fem is:pl
AM po:mg po:detdem is:mas is:sg
AM po:mg po:detdem is:fem is:sg
AM po:mg po:detdem is:epi is:pl
AM po:mg po:det is:epi is:sg
AM po:mg po:det is:epi is:inv
AM po:mg po:cjsub po:adv
AM po:mg po:cjco po:adv
AM po:mg po:cj
AM po:mg po:advint po:prorel
AM po:mg po:adv po:prodem
AM po:mg po:adv po:nom
AM po:mg po:adv po:negadv
AM po:mg po:adv po:loc.adv po:loc.prep po:loc.cj
AM po:mg po:adv po:cjco
AM po:loc.prep po:loc.adv
AM po:loc.nom is:mas is:inv
AM po:ipsi po:3pl
AM po:ipre po:1sg po:3sg
AM po:impe po:2sg ds:+y
AM po:impe po:2sg ds:+en
AM po:impe po:2pl ds:+y
AM po:impe po:2pl ds:+en
AM po:impe po:1pl ds:+y
AM po:impe po:1pl ds:+en
AM po:adv st:vx
AM po:?
AM dp:te+
AM dp:si+
AM dp:se+
AM dp:ne+
AM dp:me+
AM dp:jusque+
AM dp:je+

AF 276
AF S.()
AF S*()
AF F.()
AF a0p+()
AF F*()
AF L'D'Q'
AF W.()
AF n'q'l'm't's'
AF D'Q'
AF a2p+()
AF a0p.()
AF a4p+()
AF n'q'l'm'
AF s'
AF n'
AF n'q'l't'
AF X.()
AF W*()
AF n'q'j'l'm't'
AF n'q'
AF n'q'm't's'
AF f0p+()
AF --
AF n'q'l'm't'
AF t'
AF n'm'
AF c0p+()
AF L'D'
AF n't'
AF n'j'
AF n'j'm't'
AF ||--
AF n'q'j'l'm't's'
AF n'm't'
AF d0p+()
AF n'l'm'
AF m'
AF A.()
AF n'q'l'
AF m't'
AF n'l'm't'
AF L'
AF n'q'j'l't'
AF a1p.()
AF f4p+()
AF a3p+()
AF b0p+()
AF n'l'
AF X*()
AF D'L'Q'
AF I.()
AF m's'
AF tA()
AF n'q'd'l'm't's'
AF n'q'j'm't's'
AF f0p.()
AF U.||--
AF n'q'm't'
AF c2p+()
AF n'q'j'
AF m't's'
AF Um()
AF n'q'l's'
AF f2p+()
AF q'
AF c4p+()
AF c0p.()
AF a6p+()
AF wB()
AF i0q+()
AF a8p.()
AF D'
AF d2p+()
AF d0p.()
AF Q'
AF vA()
AF yM()
AF wQq+()
AF y1()
AF n'm't's'
AF n'q'j'm't'
AF n'q'd'
AF iC()
AF i5q+()
AF S=
AF yL()
AF uA()
AF n'q't'
AF n'q'm'
AF n'j'q'
AF d4p+()
AF I*()
AF n'q'd'm't's'
AF wD()
AF tF()
AF b2p+()
AF pK()
AF n'q'c'l'm't'
AF b4p+()
AF wQq.()
AF wL()
AF n'q'j'l'
AF f1p+()
AF n'q'j'l'm'
AF iK()
AF c1p.()
AF D'Q'Qj
AF yV()
AF yD()
AF xN()
AF wT()
AF wS()
AF wR()
AF pS()
AF iG()
AF iE()
AF iD()
AF f3p+()
AF f1p.()
AF a5p.()
AF Ui()
AF D'Q'Q*
AF A*()
AF yU()
AF xP()
AF xO()
AF xL()
AF wO()
AF wNq.()
AF tM()
AF tG()
AF tEq.()
AF pF()
AF n'q'j'l'm's'
AF n'q'd'm't'
AF n'q'c'l'm't's'
AF n'l't'
AF iS()
AF iR()
AF iF()
AF c5p.()
AF b0p.()
AF a8p+()
AF a0()
AF yX()
AF yW()
AF yN()
AF yC()
AF yB()
AF yA()
AF xSq+()
AF xQ()
AF xC()
AF xA()
AF wV()
AF wTwU()
AF wP()
AF wM()
AF rA()
AF pZ()
AF pX()
AF pW()
AF pT()
AF pJ()
AF pH()
AF n'q'd'l'
AF m'q'd'm't's'
AF iQ()
AF iJ()
AF i1q+()
AF fB()
AF d1p.()
AF c3p+()
AF aZ()
AF aY()
AF aG()
AF aD()
AF L'D'Q'Q*Qj
AF ||
AF zE()
AF zA()
AF yZ()
AF yY()
AF yO()
AF yK()
AF yJ()
AF yG()
AF yF()
AF yE()
AF xSq.()
AF xR()
AF xM()
AF xK()
AF xJ()
AF xD()
AF wNq+()
AF wG()
AF wF()
AF wA()
AF vC()
AF uD()
AF uC()
AF tU()
AF tEq+()
AF tD()
AF rD()
AF rC()
AF rArB()
AF qA()
AF pY()
AF pV()
AF pU()
AF pR()
AF pQ()
AF pP()
AF pO()
AF pNq.()
AF pNq+()
AF pM()
AF pHpI()
AF pFpG()
AF pE()
AF pCpD()
AF pC()
AF pB()
AF pA()
AF n'q'd'l'm't'
AF n'j'm't's'
AF n'j'l'm't'
AF n'd'
AF m'q'm't's'
AF m'q'l't's'
AF iY()
AF iX()
AF iW()
AF iV()
AF iU()
AF iT()
AF iP()
AF iO()
AF iN()
AF iM()
AF iI()
AF iB()
AF iA()
AF i5q.()
AF i2q+()
AF i0q.()
AF fZ()
AF fY()
AF fD()
AF fC()
AF fA()
AF f5p+()
AF dA()
AF b3p+()
AF aH()
AF aF()
AF aE()
AF aA()
AF a8a9p+()
AF a1p+()
AF S.||()
AF S.()--
AF S.
AF Q'QjQ*
AF Q'Q*n'd'j'l'm't's'
AF Q'Q*Qjn'd'j'l'm't's'c'
AF Q'Q*
AF L'D'Q'QjQ*
AF L'D'Q'Qj
AF L'D'Q'Q*
AF D'Qj
AF D'Q'Q*Si
AF D'Q'Q*QjSi
AF D'Q'--


PFX L' Y 34
PFX L' 0 l' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 94
PFX L' a l'A a 94
PFX L' à l'À à 94
PFX L' â l'Â â 94
PFX L' e l'E e 94
PFX L' é l'É é 94
PFX L' è l'È è 94
PFX L' ê l'Ê ê 94
PFX L' i l'I i 94
PFX L' î l'Î î 94
PFX L' o l'O o 94
PFX L' ô l'Ô ô 94
PFX L' u l'U u 94
PFX L' y l'Y y 94
PFX L' h l'H h 94
PFX L' œ l'Œ œ 94
PFX L' æ l'Æ æ 94
PFX L' 0 L' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 94
PFX L' a L'A a 94
PFX L' à L'À à 94
PFX L' â L'Â â 94
PFX L' e L'E e 94
PFX L' é L'É é 94
PFX L' è L'È è 94
PFX L' ê L'Ê ê 94
PFX L' i L'I i 94
PFX L' î L'Î î 94
PFX L' o L'O o 94
PFX L' ô L'Ô ô 94
PFX L' u L'U u 94
PFX L' y L'Y y 94
PFX L' h L'H h 94
PFX L' œ L'Œ œ 94
PFX L' æ L'Æ æ 94

PFX D' Y 34
PFX D' 0 d' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 95
PFX D' a d'A a 95
PFX D' à d'À à 95
PFX D' â d'Â â 95
PFX D' e d'E e 95
PFX D' é d'É é 95
PFX D' è d'È è 95
PFX D' ê d'Ê ê 95
PFX D' i d'I i 95
PFX D' î d'Î î 95
PFX D' o d'O o 95
PFX D' ô d'Ô ô 95
PFX D' u d'U u 95
PFX D' y d'Y y 95
PFX D' h d'H h 95
PFX D' œ d'Œ œ 95
PFX D' æ d'Æ æ 95
PFX D' 0 D' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 95
PFX D' a D'A a 95
PFX D' à D'À à 95
PFX D' â D'Â â 95
PFX D' e D'E e 95
PFX D' é D'É é 95
PFX D' è D'È è 95
PFX D' ê D'Ê ê 95
PFX D' i D'I i 95
PFX D' î D'Î î 95
PFX D' o D'O o 95
PFX D' ô D'Ô ô 95
PFX D' u D'U u 95
PFX D' y D'Y y 95
PFX D' h D'H h 95
PFX D' œ D'Œ œ 95
PFX D' æ D'Æ æ 95

PFX Q' Y 34
PFX Q' 0 qu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 101
PFX Q' a qu'A a 101
PFX Q' à qu'À à 101
PFX Q' â qu'Â â 101
PFX Q' e qu'E e 101
PFX Q' é qu'É é 101
PFX Q' è qu'È è 101
PFX Q' ê qu'Ê ê 101
PFX Q' i qu'I i 101
PFX Q' î qu'Î î 101
PFX Q' o qu'O o 101
PFX Q' ô qu'Ô ô 101
PFX Q' u qu'U u 101
PFX Q' y qu'Y y 101
PFX Q' h qu'H h 101
PFX Q' œ qu'Œ œ 101
PFX Q' æ qu'Æ æ 101
PFX Q' 0 Qu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 101
PFX Q' a Qu'A a 101
PFX Q' à Qu'À à 101
PFX Q' â Qu'Â â 101
PFX Q' e Qu'E e 101
PFX Q' é Qu'É é 101
PFX Q' è Qu'È è 101
PFX Q' ê Qu'Ê ê 101
PFX Q' i Qu'I i 101
PFX Q' î Qu'Î î 101
PFX Q' o Qu'O o 101
PFX Q' ô Qu'Ô ô 101
PFX Q' u Qu'U u 101
PFX Q' y Qu'Y y 101
PFX Q' h Qu'H h 101
PFX Q' œ Qu'Œ œ 101
PFX Q' æ Qu'Æ æ 101

PFX Q* Y 6
PFX Q* 0 quoiqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 294
PFX Q* 0 puisqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 295
PFX Q* 0 lorsqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 296
PFX Q* 0 Quoiqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 294
PFX Q* 0 Puisqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 295
PFX Q* 0 Lorsqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 296

PFX Qj Y 1
PFX Qj 0 jusqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 483

PFX Si Y 1
PFX Si 0 s' . 479

SFX S. Y 2
SFX S. 0 0 [^sxz] 143
SFX S. 0 s [^sxz] 91

SFX S= Y 1
SFX S= 0 s [^sxz]

SFX X. Y 4
SFX X. 0 0 [ul] 143
SFX X. 0 x [aeoœ]u 91
SFX X. l ux al 91
SFX X. il ux ail 91

SFX A. Y 11
SFX A. 0 0 [^sxz] 143
SFX A. 0 0 [sxz] 187
SFX A. 0 s [^sxz] 91
SFX A. an en an 91
SFX A. f ves f 91
SFX A. h hes h 91
SFX A. s ses s 91
SFX A. x xes x 91
SFX A. y ies y 91
SFX A. zz zzes zz 91
SFX A. z zzes [^z]z 91

SFX I. Y 9
SFX I. 0 0 [^sxz] 143
SFX I. 0 0 [sxz] 187
SFX I. 0 s [^sxz] 91
SFX I. a e a 91
SFX I. e i e 91
SFX I. en ina en 91
SFX I. o i o 91
SFX I. um a um 91
SFX I. us i us 91

SFX F. Y 79
SFX F. 0 0 [eë] 222
SFX F. 0 s [eë] 223
SFX F. e 0 [éiï]e 82
SFX F. e s [éiï]e 83
SFX F. rice eur [dt]rice 82
SFX F. rice eurs [dt]rice 83
SFX F. de d de 82
SFX F. de ds de 83
SFX F. fe f fe 82
SFX F. fe fs fe 83
SFX F. anche anc anche 82
SFX F. anche ancs anche 83
SFX F. èche ec èche 82
SFX F. èche ecs èche 83
SFX F. aiche ais aiche 126
SFX F. aîche ais aîche 126
SFX F. khe kh khe 82
SFX F. khe khs khe 83
SFX F. he h [ut]he 82
SFX F. he hs [ut]he 83
SFX F. ke k [^è]ke 82
SFX F. ke ks [^è]ke 83
SFX F. èke ek èke 82
SFX F. èke eks èke 83
SFX F. le l [aiouûh]le 82
SFX F. le ls [aiouûh]le 83
SFX F. lle l [eiu]lle 82
SFX F. lle ls [eiu]lle 83
SFX F. olle ou olle 82
SFX F. olle ous olle 83
SFX F. olle ol olle 82
SFX F. olle ols olle 83
SFX F. ne n [aiouï]ne 82
SFX F. ne ns [aiouï]ne 83
SFX F. nne n [aeo]nne 82
SFX F. nne ns [aeo]nne 83
SFX F. ène en ène 82
SFX F. ène ens ène 83
SFX F. igne in igne 82
SFX F. igne ins igne 83
SFX F. re r [aiuûy]re 82
SFX F. re rs [aiuûy]re 83
SFX F. ère er ère 82
SFX F. ère ers ère 83
SFX F. se s [^us]se 126
SFX F. esse e [^eo].esse 82
SFX F. esse es [^eo].esse 83
SFX F. rofesse rofès rofesse 126
SFX F. eresse eur eresse 82
SFX F. eresse eurs eresse 83
SFX F. oresse eur oresse 82
SFX F. oresse eurs oresse 83
SFX F. sse s [^e]sse 126
SFX F. use us [^eo]use 126
SFX F. euse eur euse 82
SFX F. euse eurs euse 83
SFX F. te t [^èt]te 82
SFX F. te ts [^èt]te 83
SFX F. tte t tte 82
SFX F. tte ts tte 83
SFX F. ète et ète 82
SFX F. ète ets ète 83
SFX F. ue u [^gq]ue 82
SFX F. ue us [^gq]ue 83
SFX F. gue g gue 82
SFX F. gue gs gue 83
SFX F. cque c cque 82
SFX F. cque cs cque 83
SFX F. que c [^c]que 82
SFX F. que cs [^c]que 83
SFX F. ève ef ève 82
SFX F. ève efs ève 83
SFX F. ve f [iïu]ve 82
SFX F. ve fs [iïu]ve 83
SFX F. uë u uë 82
SFX F. uë us uë 83
SFX F. üe u üe 82
SFX F. üe us üe 83
SFX F. ze z ze 126

SFX W. N 16
SFX W. 0 0 e 222
SFX W. e es e 223
SFX W. ce x ce 126
SFX W. use ux [eo]use 126
SFX W. ausse aux ausse 126
SFX W. ousse oux ousse 126
SFX W. ale al ale 82
SFX W. ale aux ale 83
SFX W. elle eau elle 82
SFX W. elle eaux elle 83
SFX W. elle el [bv]elle 82
SFX W. elle els [bv]elle 83
SFX W. ieille ieux ieille 126
SFX W. ieille ieil ieille 82
SFX W. ofolle oufou ofolle 82
SFX W. ofolle oufous ofolle 83

SFX S* Y 2
SFX S* 0 0/50 [^sxz] 143
SFX S* 0 s/9 [^sxz] 91

SFX X* Y 4
SFX X* 0 0/50 [ul] 143
SFX X* 0 x/9 [aeoœ]u 91
SFX X* l ux/9 al 91
SFX X* il ux/9 ail 91

SFX A* Y 20
SFX A* an an/50 an 143
SFX A* an ans/9 an 91
SFX A* an en/9 an 91
SFX A* f f/50 f 143
SFX A* f fs/9 f 91
SFX A* f ves/9 f 91
SFX A* h h/50 h 143
SFX A* h hs/9 h 91
SFX A* h hes/9 h 91
SFX A* s s/50 s 187
SFX A* s ses/9 s 91
SFX A* x x/50 x 187
SFX A* x xes/9 x 91
SFX A* y y/50 y 143
SFX A* y ys/9 y 91
SFX A* y ies/9 y 91
SFX A* zz zz/50 zz 187
SFX A* zz zzes/9 zz 91
SFX A* z z/50 [^z]z 187
SFX A* z zzes/9 [^z]z 91

SFX I* Y 17
SFX I* a a/50 a 143
SFX I* a as/9 a 91
SFX I* a e/9 a 91
SFX I* e e/50 e 143
SFX I* e es/9 e 91
SFX I* e i/9 e 91
SFX I* en en/50 en 143
SFX I* en ens/9 en 91
SFX I* en ina/9 en 91
SFX I* o o/50 o 143
SFX I* o os/9 o 91
SFX I* o i/9 o 91
SFX I* um um/50 um 143
SFX I* um ums/9 um 91
SFX I* um a/9 um 91
SFX I* us us/50 us 187
SFX I* us i/9 us 91
